Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.020

Creation of district—Special assessments or rates and charges.

(1) Any county may create lake or beach management districts to finance: (a) The improvement and maintenance of lakes or beaches located within or partially within the boundaries of the county; and (b) the acquisition of real property or property rights within or outside a lake or beach management district including, by way of example, conservation easements authorized under RCW 64.04.130, and to promote the conservation and stewardship of shorelines as well as the conservation and stewardship of upland properties adjoining lakes or beaches for conservation or for minimal development. All or a portion of a lake or beach and the adjacent land areas may be included within one or more lake or beach management districts. More than one lake or beach, or portions of lakes or beaches, and the adjacent land areas may be included in a single lake or beach management district.

(2) For the purposes of this chapter, the term "improvement" includes, among other things, the acquisition of real property and property rights within or outside a lake or beach management district for the purposes set forth in RCW 36.61.010 and this section.

(3) Special assessments or rates and charges may be imposed on the property included within a lake or beach management district to finance lake or beach improvement and maintenance activities, including: (a) Controlling or removing aquatic plants and vegetation; (b) improving water quality; (c) controlling water levels; (d) treating and diverting stormwater; (e) controlling agricultural waste; (f) studying lake or marine water quality problems and solutions; (g) cleaning and maintaining ditches and streams entering the lake or marine waters or leaving the lake; (h) monitoring air quality; (i) the acquisition of real property and property rights; and (j) the related administrative, engineering, legal, and operational costs, including the costs of creating the lake or beach management district.

(4) Special assessments or rates and charges may be imposed annually on all the land in a lake or beach management district for the duration of the lake or beach management district without a related issuance of lake or beach management district bonds or revenue bonds. Special assessments also may be imposed in the manner of special assessments in a local improvement district with each landowner being given the choice of paying the entire special assessment in one payment, or to paying installments, with lake or beach management district bonds being issued to obtain moneys not derived by the initial full payment of the special assessments, and the installments covering all of the costs related to issuing, selling, and redeeming the lake or beach management district bonds.

[ 2014 c 85 s 2; 2008 c 301 s 3; 2000 c 184 s 5; 1987 c 432 s 2; 1985 c 398 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2000 c 184: See note following RCW 39.96.010.

Cities and towns authorized to establish lake and beach management districts: RCW 35.21.403.

Flood control districts authorized to engage in activities under RCW 36.61.020: RCW 86.09.151.